North Dakota, session 69, HB1084.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-19-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
4.1-19-03. Purposes - Duties.
The agriculture commissioner shall:
1. Promote improved poultry breeding practices and cooperate with the board of animal health in
controlling and eradicating contagious or infectious diseases of poultry.
2. Act as the official state agency for North Dakota in cooperation with the veterinary services,
animal plant health inspection service, and United States department of agriculture, for the
purpose of furthering the objectives and supervising the state's participation in the national
poultry improvement plan.
3. Act as the state agency to cooperate with the United States department of agriculture to
provide federal-state grading service for poultry and poultry products offered for sale at the
retail level, to supervise the federal-state poultry grading service, and to enforce regulations at
the retail level as to identification by grade of all poultry sold.
4.3. Promote the welfare and improvement of the poultry industry and the marketing of poultry and
poultry products within the state.
5.4. Adopt rules under chapter 28-32 as necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-19-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
4.1-19-05. Penalty.
1. Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or rule adopted under this chapter is
guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
2. AnyA person who violates any provisionin violation of this chapter or rule adopted under this
chapter may be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars for each violation.
ThisThe civil penalty may be adjudicated by the courts or by the agriculture commissioner
through an administrative hearing conducted by an independent hearing officer pursuant to
chapter 28-32.
3.2. The agriculture commissioner may maintain an appropriate civil action in the name of the state
against any person violating this chapter or rule adopted under this chapter.
4. Any person who knowingly makes a false statement, representation, or certification in any
application, record, report, or other document is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

H. B. NO. 1084 - PAGE 2
5.3. For purposes of this section, "person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited
liability company, association, cooperative, or any business entity.
SECTION 3. REPEAL. Section 4.1-19-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is repealed.

H. B. NO. 1084 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1084.
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 1 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State